Nevada, session 83, SB125.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 217.096 is hereby amended to read as follows:
217.096 1. In collaboration with persons and entities that
advocate for the needs of victims, the Division shall, to the extent
that money is available for this purpose, designate a statewide center
to provide assistance to victims.
2. If a center is designated pursuant to subsection 1, the center
must, to the extent money is available, provide support services to
victims, including, without limitation, by:
(a) Providing referral services and case management services to
connect victims with:
(1) Necessary medical and behavioral health care services,
including, without limitation, counseling services and treatment for
post-traumatic stress;
(2) Agencies which provide compensation to and support for
victims;
(3) Legal aid services; and
(4) Services provided by a federal, state or local law
enforcement agency;
(b) Providing advocacy services for victims, including, without
limitation, services designed to ensure victims are reimbursed for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
out-of-pocket expenses that are eligible for reimbursement by an
agency which provides compensation and support for victims;
(c) Providing information concerning counseling services and
facilitating the provision of counseling services, including, without
limitation, through virtual and in-person support groups and
wellness events;
(d) Providing technical assistance with applying for online
services available to victims;
(e) Operating a call center for the purpose of providing
information relating to support services available to victims; and
(f) Responding to critical incidents in this State.
3. If a center is designated pursuant to subsection 1, the center
must:
(a) Be based in a county whose population is 700,000 or more
and provide direct services to victims in that county;
(b) To the extent money is available, assist the Division with
expanding the services available to victims in this State; and
(c) To the extent money is available, provide training and
technical assistance and take other preparatory steps to ensure that
communities throughout the State are adequately trained and
equipped to provide support services to victims relating to critical
incidents.
4. Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, a governmental
entity may provide confidential information to a center designated
pursuant to subsection 1 for the limited purpose of providing
support services to victims. The center shall not disclose any
confidential information received pursuant to this subsection, and
receipt of the information does not alter, affect, abrogate or waive
the confidential status of the information.
5. The Administrator may accept any gift, grant, donation,
bequest or other source of money for the purposes of carrying out
the provisions of this section. Any money so received must be
deposited in the Victim Support Gift Account, which is hereby
established in the State General Fund. The Administrator shall
administer the Account. The interest and income earned on money
in the Account from any gift, grant, donation or bequest, after
deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the Account.
Money from any gift, grant, donation or bequest that remains in the
Account at the end of the fiscal year does not revert to the State
General Fund, and the balance in the Account must be carried
forward to the next fiscal year.
[5.] 6. As used in this section:
(a) “Administrator” means the Administrator of the Division.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) “Critical incident” means an abnormal event that is sudden
and unexpected and has a stressful impact sufficient to overwhelm
the coping skills of a person.
(c) “Division” means the Division of Child and Family Services
of the Department.
(d) “Governmental entity” means:
(1) The government of this State;
(2) An agency of the government of this State;
(3) A political subdivision of this State; and
(4) An agency of a political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Victim” means a person who suffers direct harm as a result
of a violent crime or a person who suffers harm as an indirect
consequence of a violent crime, including, without limitation, by
witnessing the crime.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)